Wisconsin, session 2025, SB919.
do enact as follows:Law Revision Committee prefatory note: This bill is a remedial legislation proposal, requested by the Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation (WEDC) and introduced by the Law Revision Committee under s. 13.83 (1) (c) 4. and 5., stats. After careful consideration of the various provisions of the bill, the Law Revision Committee has determined that this bill makes minor substantive changes in the statutes, and that these changes are desirable as a matter of public policy.SB919,11Section 1. 238.03 (5) of the statutes is repealed.Note: A requirement that the board of directors of WEDC hire an electronics manufacturing small business development director expired on December 31, 2022. This Section repeals this obsolete provision.SB919,22Section 2. 238.04 (15) of the statutes is repealed.Note: Created by 2017 Wisconsin Act 58, the economic development liaison project position within WEDC expired on December 31, 2022. This Section repeals an obsolete provision requiring the board of directors of WEDC to appoint and supervise that position.SB919,2,33